North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-03 Deputy Officers

44-03-01.
Deputies may be appointed by certain officers.

The secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer, insurance commissioner, agriculture commissioner, commissioner of labor, district assessor, and city assessor each may appoint a deputy. The appointment must be in writing and is revocable in writing at the pleasure of the principal, and the appointment and revocation must be filed as the oath of the principal is filed.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 6, § 1; S.L. 1890, ch. 59, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 370; R.C. 1899, § 370; S.L. 1905, ch. 100, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 433; C.L. 1913, § 701; R.C. 1943, § 44-0301; S.L. 1967, ch. 358, § 1; 1999, ch. 35, § 32; S.L. 1999, ch. 113, § 14.

Cross-References.

Authority of deputy, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-11.

44-03-02.
Persons ineligible as deputy.

No state officer can appoint as deputy any other state or district officer. A state treasurer may not appoint as deputy any county treasurer, recorder, sheriff, or county commissioner.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 6, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 373; R.C. 1899, § 373; R.C. 1905, § 436; C.L. 1913, § 704; R.C. 1943, § 44-0302; 1991, ch. 326, § 166; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

44-03-03.
Oath of deputy.

Each deputy shall take and subscribe the same oath as the deputy’s principal, naming the deputyship, which must be endorsed upon and filed with the deputy’s certificate of appointment.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 6, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 372; R.C. 1899, § 372; R.C. 1905, § 435; C.L. 1913, § 703; R.C. 1943, § 44-0303.

Cross-References.

Oath of civil officers generally, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

Oath of county officers, see N.D.C.C. § 11-10-09.

Oath of municipal officers, see N.D.C.C. § 40-13-03.

Collateral References.

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty, 18 A.L.R.2d 268.

44-03-04.
Officials to be residents and citizens.

No person may be appointed as deputy in any state office nor as a member or officer upon any official board of the state, or of any county or municipality of the state, who is not a citizen of the United States and who is not a bona fide resident of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 91, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 374; R.C. 1899, § 374; R.C. 1905, § 437; S.L. 1911, ch. 120, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 705; 1925 Supp., § 705; R.C. 1943, § 44-0304; S.L. 1989, ch. 539, § 1; 1993, ch. 440, § 1.